West Virginia, session 2026, HB4494.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. wildlife resources. §20-2-42aa. Exemption for a non-resident landowner from purchasing a non-resident hunting license while hunting on their land in this state A non-resident landowner and the spouse and children living with the non-resident landowner may hunt on the property he or she owns in this state without a license: Provided, That the home state of the non-resident landowner permits West Virginia residents the same exemption on property that West Virginia residents own.  Grandchildren of non-resident landowners shall not qualify for this exemption.